hu: Asztalláb kialakítása: A-alakú; Állítható oszlopláb; Cabriole; Konzol; Dob; Bordázott; Összecsukható; H-vázas; Hajtű; L-alakú; Esztergált; Oszloplábas; Piramis; Kerek oszlopos; Pók; Kifelé dőlő; Szögletes oszlopos; Egyenes; Kúpos; Trapéz; Keresztgerendás; Esztergált; Kétoldalt kúpos; U-alakú; V-vázas; X-vázas; Egyéb
en: Table leg design: A-shape; Adjustable pedestal; Cabriole; Cantilever; Drum; Fluted; Folding; H-frame; Hairpin; L-shape; Lathe-turned; Pedestal; Pyramid; Round column; Spider; Splayed; Square column; Straight; Tapered; Trapezoid; Trestle; Turned; Two-sided taper; U-shape; V-frame; X-frame; Other
sv: Bordsbensdesign: A-form; Justerbar pelare; Cabriole; Fribärande; Trumma; Räfflad; Fällbar; H-ram; Hårnål; L-form; Svarvad; Pelare; Pyramid; Rund pelare; Spindel; Utställd; Fyrkantig pelare; Rak; Avsmalnande; Trapetsformad; Bock; Svarvad; Dubbelsidigt avsmalnande; U-form; V-ram; X-ram; Annan
el: Σχεδιασμός ποδιών τραπεζιού: Σχήμα A; Ρυθμιζόμενη κεντρική βάση; Καμπριόλ; Πρόβολος; Κύλινδρος; Με ραβδώσεις; Πτυσσόμενα; Πλαίσιο H; Φουρκέτα; Σχήμα L; Τορευτά; Κεντρική βάση; Πυραμίδα; Στρογγυλή κολόνα; Αράχνη; Ανοιχτά; Τετράγωνη κολόνα; Ίσια; Κωνικά; Τραπεζοειδή; Βάση με δοκό; Τορναριστά; Διπλής κλίσης; Σχήμα U; Πλαίσιο V; Πλαίσιο X; Άλλο
bg-BG: Дизайн на краката на масата: A-образна; Регулируем пиедестал; Кабриол; Конзолна; Барабан; Набраздена; Сгъваема; H-образна рамка; Тип фиба; L-образна; Стругована; Пиедестал; Пирамида; Кръгла колона; Паяк; Разперена; Квадратна колона; Права; Заострена; Трапец; Естакада; Стругована; Двустранно заострена; U-образна; V-образна рамка; X-образна рамка; Друго
es: Diseño de las patas de mesa: En forma de A; Pedestal ajustable; Cabriolé; Voladizo; Tambor; Estriado; Plegable; Estructura en H; Horquilla; En forma de L; Torneado; Pedestal; Pirámide; Columna redonda; Araña; Inclinadas hacia afuera; Columna cuadrada; Recto; Cónico; Trapezoidal; Caballete; Torneado; Cónico de dos lados; En forma de U; Estructura en V; Estructura en X; Otro
vi: Thiết kế chân bàn: Chữ A; Bệ đỡ có thể điều chỉnh; Uốn cong (Cabriole); Đòn bẩy; Hình trống; Rãnh xẻ dọc; Gấp gọn; Khung chữ H; Kẹp tăm (Hairpin); Chữ L; Tiện tròn; Bệ đỡ; Kim tự tháp; Cột tròn; Chân nhện; Xòe; Cột vuông; Thẳng; Vuốt thon; Hình thang; Chân giá đỡ; Tiện; Vuốt thon hai cạnh; Chữ U; Khung chữ V; Khung chữ X; Khác
zh-TW: 桌腳設計: A 字型; 可調式單柱; 卡布里腿 (Cabriole); 懸臂式; 鼓型; 凹槽雕花; 折疊式; H 型框架; 髮夾腳; L 字型; 車床旋削; 單柱式; 金字塔型; 圓柱; 蜘蛛腳; 外擴式; 方柱; 直管型; 錐形; 梯形; 棧橋式; 車床加工; 雙面錐形; U 字型; V 型框架; X 型框架; 其他
sl-SI: Zasnova nog mize: V obliki črke A; Nastavljiv centralni steber; Kabriolna noga; Konzolna; Boben; Žlebičasta; Zložljiva; V obliki črke H; Lasnica (hairpin); V obliki črke L; Stružena; Centralni steber; Piramida; Okrogel steber; Pajek; Navzven usmerjena; Kvadraten steber; Ravna; Koničasta; Trapez; Podstavek s prečko; Stružena; Dvostransko koničasta; V obliki črke U; V obliki črke V; V obliki črke X; Drugo
lt-LT: Stalo kojų dizainas: A formos; Reguliuojamas pjedestalas; Kabriolės tipo (išlenktos); Konsolinės (gembinės); Būgno formos; Rievėtos (kaneliūrinės); Sulankstomos; H formos rėmas; Segtuko formos („Hairpin“); L formos; Tekintos (staklėmis); Pjedestalo tipo; Piramidės formos; Apvali kolona; Voro kojų tipo; Išskėstos; Kvadratinė kolona; Tiesios; Smailėjančios; Trapecijos formos; Su atrama (sija); Tekintos; Dvipusio smailėjimo; U formos; V formos rėmas; X formos rėmas; Kita
da: Design af bordben: A-form; Justerbar piedestal; Cabriole; Frisvinger; Tromme; Riflet; Sammenklappelig; H-ramme; Hairpin; L-form; Maskindrejet; Piedestal; Pyramide; Rund søjle; Edderkop; Udadskrånende; Firkantet søjle; Lige; Tilspidset; Trapezformet; Bukke; Drejet; Dobbeltsidet tilspidset; U-form; V-ramme; X-ramme; Andet
de: Design des Tischbeins: A-Form; Verstellbare Säule; Cabriole; Freischwinger; Trommel; Geriffelt; Klappbar; H-Gestell; Haarnadel; L-Form; Gedrechselt; Säule; Pyramide; Runde Säule; Spinne; Ausgestellt; Quadratische Säule; Gerade; Verjüngt; Trapez; Bockgestell; Gedrechselt; Zweiseitig verjüngt; U-Form; V-Gestell; X-Gestell; Sonstige
nl: Tafelpoot ontwerp: A-vorm; Verstelbare kolomvoet; Cabriole; Vrijdragend; Trommel; Gecanneleerd; Inklapbaar; H-frame; Hairpin; L-vorm; Gedraaid; Kolomvoet; Piramide; Ronde kolom; Spin; Uiteenstaand; Vierkante kolom; Recht; Taps toelopend; Trapezium; Schraagpoot; Gedraaid; Tweezijdig taps toelopend; U-vorm; V-frame; X-frame; Overig
pt-BR: Mesa design da perna: Formato em A; Pedestal ajustável; Cabriolé; Cantiléver; Tambor; Canelada; Dobrável; Estrutura em H; Hairpin; Formato em L; Torneada; Pedestal; Pirâmide; Coluna redonda; Aranha; Inclinada; Coluna quadrada; Reta; Cônica; Trapezoidal; Cavalete; Torneada; Cônica de dois lados; Formato em U; Estrutura em V; Estrutura em X; Outra
pl: Projekt nogi stołu: W kształcie litery A; Regulowana kolumna; Kabriol; Wspornikowa; Bębnowa; Żłobiona; Składana; Rama w kształcie litery H; Spinka (Hairpin); W kształcie litery L; Toczona; Kolumna; Piramida; Okrągła kolumna; Pająk; Rozchylona; Kwadratowa kolumna; Prosta; Zwężana; Trapez; Typu trestle (z belką); Toczona; Zwężana dwustronnie; W kształcie litery U; Rama w kształcie litery V; Rama w kształcie litery X; Inny
th: การออกแบบขาโต๊ะ: รูปตัวA; ฐานเดี่ยวปรับได้; ขาสิงห์; คานยื่น; ทรงกลอง; เซาะร่อง; พับได้; โครงรูปตัวH; ขาแฮร์พิน; รูปตัวL; กลึง; ฐานเดี่ยว; พีระมิด; เสากลม; ทรงแมงมุม; กางออก; เสาเหลี่ยม; ตรง; ปลายสอบ; สี่เหลี่ยมคางหมู; ขาหยั่ง; กลึง; ปลายสอบสองด้าน; รูปตัวU; โครงรูปตัวV; โครงรูปตัวX; อื่นๆ
ja: テーブル脚デザイン: A字型; 調整可能ペデスタル; カブリオール; カンチレバー; ドラム; フルート; 折りたたみ; Hフレーム; ヘアピン; L字型; 旋盤加工; ペデスタル; ピラミッド; ラウンドカラム; スパイダー; スプレイド; スクエアカラム; ストレート; テーパード; トラペゾイド; トレストル; ろくろ挽き; 2面テーパー; U字型; Vフレーム; Xフレーム; その他
ru: Конструкция ножек стола: А-образная форма; Регулируемый пьедестал; Кабриоль; Консольные; В форме барабана; С каннелюрами; Складные; Н-образная рама; Шпильки; L-образная форма; Токарные; Пьедестал; Пирамидальные; Круглая колонна; Паук; Расклешенные; Квадратная колонна; Прямые; Сужающиеся; Трапециевидные; Эстакадные; Точеные; Двухстороннее сужение; U-образная форма; V-образная рама; X-образная рама; Другое
hr-HR: Dizajn nogu stola: A-oblik; Podesivo postolje; Kabriol; Konzolni; Bubanj; Izbrazdane; Sklopive; H-okvir; Ukosnica; L-oblik; Tokarene; Postolje; Piramida; Okrugli stup; Pauk; Ukošene; Kvadratni stup; Ravne; Sužene; Trapez; Na stalku; Tokarene; Dvostrano suženje; U-oblik; V-okvir; X-okvir; Ostalo
fi: Pöydän jalan muotoilu: A-muoto; Säädettävä jalusta; Cabriole; Uloke; Rumpu; Uurrettu; Taittuva; H-kehys; Hiuspinni; L-muoto; Sorvattu; Keskiöjalusta; Pyramidi; Pyöreä pylväs; Hämähäkki; Haritettu; Neliönmuotoinen pylväs; Suora; Kavennettu; Puolisuunnikas; Pukkijalat; Sorvattu; Kaksipuolisesti kavennettu; U-muoto; V-kehys; X-kehys; Muu
zh-CN: 桌腿设计: A 形; 可调式台柱; 猫脚; 悬臂式; 鼓形; 凹槽纹; 折叠款; H 形框架; 发夹式; L 形; 车床加工式; 台柱式; 金字塔形; 圆柱形; 蜘蛛形; 外八字; 方柱形; 直腿; 锥形; 梯形; 栈桥式; 车削纹; 双面锥形; U 形; V 形框架; X 形框架; 其他
nb: Bordbendesign: A-formet; Justerbar pidestall; Kabriol; Frittbærende; Tromme; Riflet; Sammenleggbar; H-ramme; Hårnål; L-formet; Dreiet; Pidestall; Pyramide; Rund søyle; Edderkopp; Skråstilt; Firkantet søyle; Rett; Konisk; Trapes; Bukk; Dreiet; Tosidig konisk; U-formet; V-ramme; X-ramme; Annet
it: Design delle gambe del tavolo: A forma di A; Piedistallo regolabile; A capriolo; A sbalzo; A tamburo; Scanalata; Pieghevole; Telaio a H; A forcina; A forma di L; Tornita al tornio; A piedistallo; A piramide; A colonna rotonda; A ragno; Svasata; A colonna quadrata; Dritta; Affusolata; A trapezio; A fratina; Tornita; Affusolata su due lati; A forma di U; Telaio a V; Telaio a X; Altro
ro-RO: Designul picioarelor mesei: Formă de A; Piedestal ajustabil; Cabriole; Consolă; Cilindru; Canelat; Pliabil; Cadru în formă de H; Ac de păr (Hairpin); Formă de L; Prelucrat la strung; Piedestal; Piramidă; Coloană rotundă; Păianjen; Evazat; Coloană pătrată; Drept; Conic; Trapez; Cu traverse; Strunjit; Conic pe două laturi; Formă de U; Cadru în formă de V; Cadru în formă de X; Altele
sk-SK: Dizajn nohy stola: Tvar A; Nastaviteľný podstavec; Prehnutá (cabriole); Konzolová; Valec; Drážkovaná; Skladacia; Rám v tvare H; Vlásenková (hairpin); Tvar L; Sústružená; Podstavec; Pyramída; Okrúhly stĺp; Pavúk; Rozkročená; Štvorcový stĺp; Rovná; Zúžená; Lichobežníková; Stojanová; Točená; Obojstranne zúžená; Tvar U; Rám v tvare V; Rám v tvare X; Iný
tr: Masa ayağı tasarımı: A şeklinde; Ayarlanabilir sütun ayak; Aslan ayağı; Konsol ayak; Silindir; Yivli; Katlanır; H iskelet; Firkete; L şeklinde; Tornada çekilmiş; Sütun ayak; Piramit; Yuvarlak sütun; Örümcek; Dışa dönük; Kare sütun; Düz; Konik; Trapez; Sehpa ayaklı; Tornalı; İki taraflı konik; U şeklinde; V iskelet; X iskelet; Diğer
ko: 테이블 다리 디자인: A자형; 조절 가능한 페데스탈; 카브리올; 캔틸레버; 드럼; 플루티드; 접이식; H 프레임; 헤어핀; L자형; 선반 가공; 페데스탈; 피라미드; 원형 기둥; 스파이더; 스플레이드; 사각 기둥; 스트레이트; 테이퍼드; 사다리꼴; 트레슬; 턴드; 양면 테이퍼드; U자형; V 프레임; X 프레임; 기타
fr: Forme des pieds de table: En A; Piédestal réglable; Cabriole; Porte-à-faux; Tambour; Cannelé; Pliant; Cadre en H; Épingle; En L; Tourné au tour; Piédestal; Pyramide; Colonne ronde; Araignée; Évasé; Colonne carrée; Droit; Fuselé; Trapézoïdal; Tréteau; Tourné; Fuselé des deux côtés; En U; Cadre en V; Cadre en X; Autre
pt-PT: Design das pernas da mesa: Em forma de A; Pedestal ajustável; Cabriole; Em consola; Tambor; Canelada; Dobrável; Estrutura em H; Gancho; Em forma de L; Torneada; Pedestal; Pirâmide; Coluna redonda; Aranha; Inclinada; Coluna quadrada; Reta; Afunilada; Trapezoidal; Cavalete; Torneada; Afunilamento de dois lados; Em forma de U; Estrutura em V; Estrutura em X; Outro
cs: Tvar noh ke stolům: Tvar A; Nastavitelný podstavec; Kabriolové; Konzolové; Buben; Rýhované; Skládací; Tvar H; Hairpin (vlásenka); Tvar L; Soustružené; Podstavec; Pyramidové; Kulatý sloup; Pavouk; Rozšířené; Čtvercový sloup; Rovné; Zúžené; Lichoběžníkové; Kozové; Soustružené; Oboustranně zúžené; Tvar U; Tvar V; Tvar X; Jiné